Hawaii, session 2026, SB1339.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that a better understanding of the carbon sequestration potential and the location and temperature of underground water resources across the State can have multiple benefits to agriculture, clean energy, and land use. The legislature also finds that resource characterization via slim-hole bores, which have a diameter of seven inches or less for over ninety per cent of the depth of the bore, can identify water and carbon sequestration resources across the state. The legislature further finds that a statewide environmental assessment of a slim-hole exploration program should be conducted, along with robust and continued community engagement, to identify the most appropriate locations for this scientific activity. The purpose of this Act is to require the Hawaii state energy office to implement a slim-hole resource characterization program that identifies the location and characteristics of underground water and carbon sequestration resources across the State under the direction of the Hawaii groundwater and geothermal resources center at the university of Hawaii. SECTION 2. Chapter 196, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding to part I a new section to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§196-     Carbon sequestration and underground water resource characterization program.  (a) There is established the carbon sequestration and underground water resource characterization program within the Hawaii state energy office to identify the location and characteristics of underground water and carbon sequestration resources across the State using the slim-hole boring exploration method.  The Hawaii state energy office shall implement the program, which shall include conducting a statewide environmental assessment of the program's actions pursuant to chapter 343, in collaboration with the Hawaii groundwater and geothermal resources center at the university of Hawaii or similar institution. (b) In advance of and during the statewide environmental assessment for the carbon sequestration and underground water resource characterization program activities, the Hawaii state energy office and collaborators shall meet with the counties and nearby communities, including individuals and civic organizations, in order to explain the purpose of the program and identify community needs, priorities, concerns, and appropriate locations to conduct the slim-hole boring for the characterization program. (c) The Hawaii state energy office shall submit a progress report on the carbon sequestration and underground water resource characterization program, including its findings, recommendations, and any proposed legislation to the legislature no later than twenty days prior to the convening of the regular session of 2028.  The report shall be made available to the public in readily accessible formats, including commonly used mapping software. " SECTION 3.  There is appropriated out of the energy security special fund established in section 201-12.8, Hawaii Revised Statutes, the sum of $16,500,000 or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026, and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 to carry out the purposes of this Act. The sums appropriated shall be expended by the Hawaii state energy office. SECTION 4. There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $135,000 or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026, and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027, for one full-time equivalent (1.0 FTE) permanent position to support the activities described by this Act. The sums appropriated shall be expended by the Hawaii state energy office. SECTION 5.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 6.  This Act, upon its approval, shall take effect on July 1, 2025. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________ BY REQUEST